Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2001.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-2989 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-2989. (a) For calendar years 2023 and 2024 2025 through
2029, if a county clerk has printing or postage costs pursuant to K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 79-2988, and amendments thereto, the county clerk shall
notify and provide documentation of such costs to the secretary of
revenue. The secretary of revenue shall certify the amount of moneys
attributable to such costs and shall transmit a copy of such certification to
the director of accounts and reports. Upon such receipt of such
certification, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount
of moneys equal to such certified amount from the state general fund to the
taxpayer notification costs fund of the department of revenue. The
secretary of revenue shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research and the director of the budget.
(b) There is hereby established in the state treasury the taxpayer
notification costs fund that shall be administered by the secretary of
revenue. All expenditures from the taxpayer notification costs fund shall
be for the purpose of paying county printing and postage costs pursuant to
K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-2988, and amendments thereto. All expenditures
from such fund shall be made in accordance with appropriations acts upon
warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to
vouchers approved by the secretary of revenue or the secretary's designee.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-2989 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.